Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska76-2007
Uniformity of application and construction.

The Uniform Statutory Rule Against Perpetuities Act shall be applied and construed to effectuate its general purpose to make uniform the law with respect to the subject of the act among states enacting it.

Laws 1989, LB 377, § 7.